Utah statutes.
26-6b-3.   Order of restriction.
(1)  The department having jurisdiction over the location where an individual
or a group of individuals who are subject to restriction are found may:
(a)  issue a written order of restriction for the individual or group of
individuals pursuant to Subsection 26-1-30(2) or 26A-1-114(1)(b) upon
compliance with the requirements of this chapter; and
(b)  issue a verbal order of restriction for an individual or group of
individuals pursuant to Subsection (2)(c).
(2) (a)  A department's determination to issue an order of restriction shall
be based upon the totality of circumstances reported to and known by the
department, including:
(i)  observation;
(ii)  information that the department determines is credible and reliable
information; and
(iii)  knowledge of current public health risks based on medically accepted
guidelines as may be established by the Department of Health by administrative
rule.
(b)  An order of restriction issued by a department must:
(i)  in the opinion of the public health official, be for the shortest
reasonable period of time necessary to protect the public health;
(ii)  use the least intrusive method of restriction that, in the opinion of
the department, is reasonable based on the totality of circumstances known to
the health department issuing the order of restriction;
(iii)  be in writing unless the provisions of Subsection (2)(c) apply; and
(iv)  contain notice of an individual's rights as required in Section
26-6b-3.3.
(c) (i)  A department may issue a verbal order of restriction, without prior
notice to the individual or group of individuals if the delay in imposing a
written order of restriction would significantly jeopardize the department's
ability to prevent or limit:
(A)  the transmission of a communicable or possibly communicable disease that
poses a threat to public health;
(B)  the transmission of an infectious agent or possibly infectious agent that
poses a threat to public health;
(C)  the exposure or possible exposure of a chemical or biological agent that
poses a threat to public health; or
(D)  the exposure or transmission of a condition that poses a threat to public
health.
(ii)  A verbal order of restriction issued under the provisions of Subsection
(2)(c)(i):
(A)  is valid for 24 hours from the time the order of restriction is issued;
(B)  may be verbally communicated to the individuals or group of individuals
subject to restriction by a first responder;
(C)  may be enforced by the first responder until the department is able to
establish and maintain the place of restriction; and
(D)  may only be continued beyond the initial 24 hours if a written order of
restriction is issued pursuant to the provisions of Section 26-6b-3.3.
(3)  Pending issuance of a written order of restriction under Section
26-6b-3.3, or judicial review of an order of restriction by the district court
pursuant to Section 26-6b-6, an individual who is subject to the order of
restriction may be required to submit to involuntary examination, quarantine,
isolation, or treatment in his home, a hospital, or any other suitable
facility under reasonable conditions prescribed by the department.
(4)  The department that issued the order of restriction shall take reasonable
measures, including the provision of medical care, as may be necessary to
assure proper care related to the reason for the involuntary examination,
treatment, isolation, or quarantine of an individual ordered to submit to an
order of restriction.
